Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201571-2482
Drugs; adulterated or misbranded; violations; penalties.

Any person violating any of the provisions of section 71-2480 or 71-2481 is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Any person, for a second or subsequent violation of any of the provisions of section 71-2480 or 71-2481, is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 26.